etc/xep/hyphen/huhyph_rx.tex
zez1re
2z1ezred
2z1ezre2i.
zezre1i
2z1ezreir
2z1ezreit
2z1ezreiv
2z1ezrek
2z1ezrel
2z1ezres
2z1ezret
1zé
zé2dal
zé1da
zé2d1elem
zé1de
zéde1le
zé2d1és
zé1dé
zé2d2z
2zég
z1é2ge
zé2hes
zé1he
2z1éhs2
z1éjs
zé2kin
zé1ki
zé2lak
zé1la
zé2l1á2
2zé2lel
zé1le
zél1elt
zé2le1ne
zé2l1e2r
2zélet.
2z1é2letb2
2z1é2le1te
2z1é2le1té
2z1é2le1ti
2z1é2letr
zé2lir
zé1li
zé2lo
zé2lu
zéndi1o2
zén1di
zé1ne2
zé2neg
zé2n1el
zé2n1is
zé1ni
zé2nu
zé2p1a2
zé2pá
zép1emb
zé1pe
zé2p1ér
zé1pé
zé2pir
zé1pi
zé2pis
2zé1pí
zé2p1o2
zé2pu
2zépül
zé1pü
zé2r1á2
zé2reg
zé1re
zér1emb
zé2rés
zé1ré
zé2ri2g
zé1ri
zé2r1o
zé2rõt
zé1rõ
2z1ér1té
2z1érth
2z1érz
zé2sa2
zé2sel
zé1se
zé2sí
zés3s2
zé2tap
zé1ta
zé2t1á2
zé2te2l
zé1te
zét1e1le
zét1e1se
zét1esn
zét1est
zé2ti
2zét1k2
zé2t1o
zé2tö
zé2tu
zé2tú
zé2t1ü
zé2tû
z1év.
zé2vek
zé1ve
2z1é2ven
2z1é2ves
2z1é2vi
2z1évn
zf2
zfe2l1em
z1fe
zfe1le
zfe2li
z2fé1ri
z1fé
z1fr
z1g2
zgás3s2
z1gá
zgá2s2z
zgés3s2
z1gé
zgó1s2
z1gó
zhad1
z1ha
zharminc1
zhar1mi
1zi
zi2ac
zi1a
2zicc
zi1c2h
z1i2dé
z1i2dõ
zie2l
zi1e
zie2m
zigaz1
zi1ga
2z1i2gaz1g2
zi2gáz
zi1gá
2z1i2gén
zi1gé
zi1g2r
zikus1s
zi1ku
z1im1ma
zi2n1á2r
zi1ná
z1in1du
zi2nol
zi1no
zi2nór
zi1nó
zin2t1el
zin1te
zin2ter
zin2to
zi2ol
zi1o
zi2óc
zi1ó
zi2óp
z1i2par
zi1pa
zi1p2l
zi1p2r
z1i2rat
zi1ra
2z1i2rá
zi2rod
zi1ro
zi2sal
zi1sa
zi2seg
zi1se
zise2l
zis1e1le
z1is1ko
zis1k2
2z1ism
zi2sor
z2i1so
1zis3s1zi
zis2s2z
2z1is1te
zi2tut
zi1tu
zi1ú2
2z1i2vó
2zizm
zi2zom
zi1zo
2zizz
1zí
zí2n1ál
zí1ná
zí2nár
zí2n1o
zí2nu
z1í2ró
zítés3s2
zí1té
zí2va2l
zí1va
zí2vi2z
zí1vi
2z1í2z
z1kh2
zki1á2
z1ki
zki1e2
z2k1ing
zk2le
z1k2lin
zk1li
z1k2lu
zkon2tár
z1ko
zkon1tá
z2ko1pi
z2kópi1á
z1kó
zkó1pi
z2kópr
z1k2ra
z1k2ru
z1k2val
zk1va
zle2ta
z1le
zle2tá
zle2t1emb
zle1te
zle2ter
zle2t1o
z2log
z1lo
zme2g1á
z1me
z2nob
z1no
1zo
zo1ki2
zok1ir
zo2koz
zo1ko
2z1o2laj
zo1la
2z1oll
zo2mag
zo1ma
2zomh
2zomv
2zomz
zo2naj
zo1na
zo2n1áll
zo1ná
zo2ne2r
zo1ne
zo1né2
zo2név
zon2tel
zon1te
zon2tol
zon1to
zo2nyan
zon2y
zo1nya
zo2nye
zo1p1hi
z2oph2
zo2ra2n
zo1ra
zo2rar
zo2r1as
2zorg
z1or1ke
z1orr.
z1or1rú
z1or1vo
2z1o2x
1zó
z2ó1á2
zó1d1re
zó1p2
z1ó2ra1i
zó1ra
z1ó2ras
zó2t2a.
zó1ta
zó2t1ért
zó1té
zó1t2h
zó1t2r
zózat1át
z2ó1za
zóza1tá
1zö
zög1ért
zö1gé
zö2g1öl
zö1gö
3zöl1de
zöl2din
zöl1di
z1ö2lel
zö1le
zö2les
2zö1ne
2zö1nö
2z1ötv
2zöv
2z1ö2z
1zõ
zõ1dr
zõe2r
z2õ1e
zõren2
zõ1re
zõrend1
zõ2ro
2zõrs
2zõrz
zõ1u2
zpen3
z1pe
z1p2l
z1p2ro
z1p2ró
zre2d3z
z1re
zren2d1õ
z2s
1z1sa
2zsaj
zs1a2la
2zs1a1mu
z3sapk
1z1sá
2zság
z3ság.
z3sá1ga
z3sá1gá
z3ság1t2
zsá2rá
1z1se
z3sej
1z1sé
2z3ség
2zs1ép
zs1érv
1z1si
2zsir
zs1i1ro
2zs1i1ta
1z1sí
z3sík
2z3síp
1z1so
2zsor
zs1orv
1z1só
1z1sö
1z1sõ
zsp2
zs3s
zst2
z3s2tí
1z1su
1z1sú
z3s2úl
1z1sü
zs1üg
zs1ü2té
1z1sû
zs2z2
z3s1za
z3s1zá
z3szeg
z1s1ze
z3szek
z3szem
zs3zen
z3sze1re
z3s1zé
z3s1zí
z3s1zo
z3s1zó
z3s1zõ
zszt2
z3s1zu
z3s1zü
z3s1zû
z2t1a2dó
z1ta
zt1a1pá
z2t1arc
z2t1as2s2z
z2táld
z1tá
zt1á2ram
ztá1ra
z2tátj
z2tá1tu
ztá2v1i2
z2t1e1lo
z1te
z2t1emb
z2tep
z2tered
zte1re
z2tesem
zte1se
z2t1é2g
z1té
z2t1é2le
z2t1ér1té
zt2hen
zt1he
zti1a2
z1ti
z2t1id
zti2g
z2t1i1gé
z2t1i2p
z2t1i1rá
z2t1i1ré
z2t1í2r
z1tí
zto1g2
z1to
zto2n1
zto2ris
zto1ri
z2torit
zto1szk
ztos2z
ztó1dr
z1tó
zt2ráj
zt1rá
z1t2ré
z2túj
z1tú
z2t1út
ztül1l
z1tü
z2t1üt
1zu
zu2b1a
3zubb
zu2b1i
zu1c2
zu2g1ár
zu1gá
zu2gí
z1ugr
zu2gu
2z1uj
zu1le2
zu2l1e1si
z1urn
zu2só
2zut
z1u2ta
z1u2tá
z1u2tó
3zuz
1zú
2zúj
z1ú2jo
z1újs
2zút
z1úth
z1útj
z1ú2to
z1úts
3zúz
1zü
2z1üd
2züg
zü2ni
zürkés1
zür1ké
2züs
2züt
z1ü2té
z1ü2tõ
z1ü2v
2züz
zü2zem
zü1ze
z1üzl
1zû
zû2c1si
zûc2s
zû2k1a
zû2za2
zû2zér
zû1zé
z1û2zõ
z2z1áll
z1zá
z2z2s2
z3z1sí
zz3st2
}
